District of Columbia statutes.
47-838

Railroad companies — Baltimore and Potomac.

The property occupied by the Baltimore and Potomac Railroad Company under authority of this section, together with the improvements which may be put thereon, shall be subject to tax by the District of Columbia the same as other property in the District of Columbia; provided, that no assessment, valuation, or tax shall be made, laid, or levied on the Baltimore and Potomac Railroad Company on account of any bridges, tunnels, elevated tracks, or subway which shall be located, constructed, or maintained under the authority of this act, and forming part of said railroad, in excess of that which would or could be lawfully made, laid, or levied if said railroad was wholly located and constructed on the surface of the ground; it being the true intent and meaning hereof that any such bridges, tunnels, elevated tracks, or subway forming a part of said railroad shall be assessed and valued for purposes of taxation and taxed on the same basis as any other equal portion of railroad situated within the said District of Columbia not constructed on, in, through, or upon any such bridges, tunnels, elevated tracks, or subway.

Feb. 12, 1901, 31 Stat. 773, ch. 353, § 14
enacted, Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-254, § 2, 44 DCR 1575

History

1981 Ed., § 47-838.
1973 Ed., § 47-720.

Prior Codifications

“This Act,” referred to in the proviso in this section, means 31 Stat. 773, ch. 353, approved February 12, 1901.

References in Text